apertium-kir.kir.lexc
LEXICON PRON-DEM-BUL

бул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:бул PRED ;
бул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:бу PRED ;   ! Dir/LR
бул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:мунун CLIT-NONPRED ;
бул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:муну CLITICS-NO-COP ;
бул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:буга CLIT-NONPRED ;
бул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:мында PRED ;
бул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:мындан PRED ;
бул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:мындай CASES ;
бул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>%<pl%>:мындайлар CASES ;
бул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<qnt%>:мынча CLITICS-NO-COP ;         !

бул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<adv%>:мындай PRED ;

бул%<prn%>%<dem%>:мын DAGI ;
бул%<prn%>%<dem%>:му NIKI ;

бул%<prn%>%<dem%>:муну POSSESSION-ENDINGS ;

бул%<prn%>%<dem%>:бу PRON-DEM-PL ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-L

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:л PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>: PRED ;  ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:н%{I%}н CLIT-NONPRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:н%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:г%{A%} CLIT-NONPRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:нд%{A%} PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:нд%{A%}н PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:нд%{A%}й CASES ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<qnt%>:нч%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<adv%>:нд%{A%}й PRED ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>:н DAGI ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>: NIKI ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<reason%>%<abl%>:нд%{I%}кт%{A%}н PRED ;  ! FIXME: need better name

%<prn%>%<dem%>:н%{I%} POSSESSION-ENDINGS ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>: PRON-DEM-PL ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-AL

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:л PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:нын CLIT-NONPRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:ны CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:га CLIT-NONPRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:нда PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:ндан PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:ндай CASES ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<qnt%>:нч%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<adv%>:ндай PRED ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>:н DAGI ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>: NIKI ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<reason%>%<abl%>:ндыктан PRED ;  ! FIXME: need better name

%<prn%>%<dem%>:ны POSSESSION-ENDINGS ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>: PRON-DEM-PL ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-TIGIL

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:л PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>: PRED ;   ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:нин CLIT-NONPRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:ни CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:ге CLIT-NONPRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:нде PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:нден PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:ндей CASES ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<qnt%>:нч%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<adv%>:ндей PRED ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>:н DAGI ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>: NIKI ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>:ни POSSESSION-ENDINGS ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>: PRON-DEM-PL ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-EN

%<nom%>:ен PRED ;
%<gen%>:енин CLIT-NONPRED ;
%<acc%>:ени CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<dat%>:ага CLIT-NONPRED ;
%<dat%>:аңа CLIT-NONPRED ;   ! Dir/LR
%<dat%>:аа CLIT-NONPRED ;    ! Dir/LR
%<loc%>:енде PRED ;
%<abl%>:енден PRED ;
%<sim%>:ендей PRED ;
:ен DAGI ;
:е NIKI ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-IZ

%<nom%>: PRED ;
%<gen%>:дин CLIT-NONPRED ;
%<acc%>:ди CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<dat%>:ге CLIT-NONPRED ;
%<loc%>:де PRED ;
%<abl%>:ден PRED ;
%<sim%>:дей PRED ;
DAGI ;
NIKI ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-AL

%<nom%>:л PRED ;
%<gen%>:нын CLIT-NONPRED ;
%<acc%>:ны CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<dat%>:га CLIT-NONPRED ;
%<loc%>:нда PRED ;
%<abl%>:ндан PRED ;
%<sim%>:ндай PRED ;
:н DAGI ;
NIKI ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-PLURALS

%<nom%>: PRED ;
%<gen%>:%>д%{I%}н CLIT-NONPRED ;
%<acc%>:%>д%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<dat%>:%>г%{A%} CLIT-NONPRED ;
%<loc%>:%>д%{A%} PRED ;
%<abl%>:%>д%{A%}н PRED ;
%<sim%>:%>д%{A%}й PRED ;
DAGI ;
NIKI ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG

%<prn%>%<itg%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG-QANDAY

%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>: CASES ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>%<px3sp%>:ы%{n%} CASES ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>%<pl%>:лар CASES ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:лар%>ы%{n%} CASES ;


LEXICON PRON-REF-ADV

GEN-POS ; ! WAS: CASES-ETC
%<adv%>:ч%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}б%{I%}з PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{A%}р PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px3pl%>:%{L%}%{A%}р%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} PRON-REF-ADV ;

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р PRON-REF-ADV ;

LEXICON PRON-IND

%<prn%>%<ind%>: POSSESSION ;
%<prn%>%<ind%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSION ;

LEXICON PRON-IND-POSS

%<prn%>%<ind%>: POSSESSION-ENDINGS ;


LEXICON PRON-DEM

%<prn%>%<dem%>: POSSESSION ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSION ;


LEXICON PRON-QNT

%<prn%>%<qnt%>: POSSESSION ;
%<prn%>%<qnt%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSION ;

LEXICON PRON-QNT-POSS

%<prn%>%<qnt%>: POSSESSION-ENDINGS ;

LEXICON PRN-NEG

%<prn%>%<neg%>: CASES ;


LEXICON PRON-RECIP

%<prn%>%<recip%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON PRON-COLL

%<num%>%<coll%>%<advl%>: # ;
%<num%>%<coll%>%<subst%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<num%>%<coll%>%<subst%>: SUBST-NONOM ;

LEXICON CLIT-QST-NO-BI

%+беле%<qst%>:% беле # ;
%+бекен%<qst%>:% бекен # ;
%+чы%<qst%>:%>ч%{I%} # ;
# ;

LEXICON CLIT-QST

V-CLIT-BI ;
CLIT-QST-NO-BI ;

LEXICON CLIT-MODASS

%+го%<mod_ass%>:% го # ;
# ;

LEXICON CLIT-GANA-ETC

# ;


LEXICON CLITICS-NO-COP

CLIT-QST ;
CLIT-MODASS ;
CLIT-GANA-ETC ;

LEXICON CLITICS-INCL-COP         ! Can appear only after nominals
                                 ! (and only after some cases).
CLITICS-NO-COP ;
! CLIT-COP ;

! LEXICON CLIT-COP

! V-PERS-COP ;

LEXICON PRED
V-PERS-COP ;
V-CLIT ;  ! TODO: I guess these aren't technically necessary?
# ;       ! TODO: .. since they're included in V-PERS-COP

LEXICON CLIT-NONPRED
V-CLIT-BI ; ! FIXME: can we just do V-CLIT ?
# ;

LEXICON V-CLIT-BI

!! Modal/discourse particles
!!!!! %+бы%<qst%>:%>%{B%}%{I%} V-PERS-COP ; ! CHECK  !! CAUSING LOOPS!
%+бы%<qst%>:%>%{B%}%{I%} # ;
%+бы%<qst%>%[+qst%]: # ;
!!!!! %+чы%<qst%>:%>ч%{I%} # ;

LEXICON V-CLIT-OTHER

CLIT-QST-NO-BI ;
CLIT-MODASS ;
%+да%<mod_tru%>:% да # ;
%+дыр%<mod_ind%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р # ;   ! FIXME: twol size acts like this is causative
%+имиш%<mod_dub%>:% имиш # ;
# ;

LEXICON V-CLIT

V-CLIT-OTHER ;
V-CLIT-BI ;

LEXICON V-PERS-COP ! P_3

%+э%<cop%>%<aor%>: V-PERS-COP-SUF ;


LEXICON V-PERS-COP-SUF

%<p3%>%<sg%>: V-CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: V-CLIT ;
V-PERS-COP-SUF-NOP3 ;


LEXICON V-PERS-COP-SUF-NOP3

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{I%}н V-CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң V-CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}з V-CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{B%}%{I%}з V-CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}ң%{A%}р V-CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}зд%{A%}р V-CLIT ;

LEXICON V-PERS-PAST ! P_4

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}м V-CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң V-CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з V-CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: V-CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}к V-CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{A%}р V-CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р V-CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>%[%+p3pl%]: V-CLIT ;


LEXICON V-PERS-COND ! P_4
! Really these should allow деле, да, дагы, etc. afterwards
!  .. but maybe those are best allowed to be their own words :)

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}м CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}к CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{A%}р CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>%[%+p3pl%]: CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-PERS-PRES ! P_6

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м V-CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң V-CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}з V-CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>т V-CLIT-OTHER ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> V-CLIT-BI ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}з V-CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}ң%{A%}р V-CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}зд%{A%}р V-CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>%[%+p3pl%]:%>т V-CLIT-OTHER ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%> V-CLIT-BI ;

LEXICON V-INFL-COMMON

V-INFL-COMMON-SECOND ;
%[%-coop%]:%>%{I%}ш V-INFL-COMMON-SECOND ;
%<coop%>:%>%{I%}ш V-INFL-COMMON-SECOND ;

LEXICON V-INFL-COMMON-ND

V-INFL-COMMON-SECOND-ND ;
%[%-coop%]:%>%{I%}ш V-INFL-COMMON-SECOND-ND ;
%<coop%>:%>%{I%}ш V-INFL-COMMON-SECOND-ND ;

LEXICON V-INFL-COMMON-SECOND

V-INFL-FINITE ;
V-INFL-NON-FINITE ;
%<asif%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н%>с%{I%} V-INFL-ASIF ;
%<asif%>%<neg%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{G%}%{A%}н%>с%{I%} V-INFL-ASIF ;

LEXICON Determiners
кайсы:кайсы PRON-ITG ;  ! FIXME: why ITG if next is DEM?
канча:канча PRON-ITG ; ! "how many / how much"
кандай:кандай PRON-ITG-QANDAY ;  ! FIXME: why ITG if next is DEM?
баары:баар PRON-QNT-POSS ;
бүт% баары:бүт% баары PRON-QNT ;
ар% ким:ар% ким PRON-IND ;
бир%-бир:бир%-бир PRON-RECIP ; ! "each other, one another"
LEXICON Pronouns
мен%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:м PRON-PERS-EN ;
сен%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:с PRON-PERS-EN ;
сиз%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<frm%>:сиз PRON-PERS-IZ ;
ал%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:а PRON-PERS-AL ;
биз%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:биз PRON-PERS-IZ ;
силер%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:силер PRON-PERS-PLURALS ;
сиздер%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<frm%>:сиздер PRON-PERS-PLURALS ;
алар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:алар PRON-PERS-PLURALS ;
PRON-DEM-BUL ; ! "this"
ошол:ошо PRON-DEM-L ; ! "that"
ушул:ушу PRON-DEM-L ; ! "this"
ал:а PRON-DEM-AL ; ! "that"
тигил:тиги PRON-DEM-TIGIL ; ! "that (yonder)
эмне:эмне PRON-ITG ; ! "what?"
кайсыны:кайсыны PRON-ITG ; ! "which one?"
ким:ким PRON-ITG ; ! "who?"
өз:өз PRON-REFL ; ! "own/self"
бул% жер PRON-DEM ;  ! compositional  ! Use/MT
ушу% жер PRON-DEM ;  ! compositional  ! Use/MT
ал% жак PRON-DEM ;   ! compositional  ! Use/MT
кай% жак PRON-DEM ; ! "where" +POSSESSION +CASES, etc. ! Use/MT
кимдир% бирөө:кимдир% бирөө PRON-IND ; ! "someone" TODO: Check
айрым:айрым PRON-IND ; ! "other"
башка:башка PRON-IND ; ! "other"  ! FIXME: DET
баары:баары PRON-IND ; ! "everyone"  !!! This is an alternate of below
баары:баар PRON-IND-POSS ; ! "everyone"
бир% нерсе:бир% нерсе PRON-IND ; ! "something"
бир% деме:бир% деме PRON-IND ; ! ""
бирөө:бирөө PRON-IND ; ! "someone"
кээ:кээ PRON-IND ;
көбү:көбү PRON-QNT ; ! "most"
кээ% бир:кээ% бир PRON-QNT ; ! "some"
бир% нече:бир% нече PRON-QNT ; ! "some, several"
көптөгөн:көптөгөн PRON-QNT ; ! "many"
бардык:бардык PRON-QNT ;
бири%-бири:бири%-бир PRON-RECIP ;   ! "each other, one another"
бири%-бири:бирин%-бир PRON-RECIP ;  ! CHECK  ! Dir/LR
бири%-бири:бир%-бир PRON-RECIP ;    ! CHECK  ! Dir/LR
кайсы% жер PRON-ITG ; ! Use/MT
эмне:эмне PRON-ITG ;
тиги:тиги PRON-DEM ;
эч% бир:эч% бир PRN-NEG ; ! ""
эч% кайда:эч% кайда PRN-NEG ; ! ""
эч% кайсы:эч% кайсы PRN-NEG ; ! ""
эч% кандай:эч% кандай PRN-NEG ; ! ""
эч% канча:эч% канча PRN-NEG ; ! ""
эч% качан:эч% качан PRN-NEG ; ! ""
эч% ким:эч% ким PRN-NEG ; ! "no one"
эч% нерсе:эч% нерсе PRN-NEG ; ! "nothing"
LEXICON Numerals
бир:бирөө PRON-COLL ;
эки:экөө PRON-COLL ;
үч:үчөө PRON-COLL ;
төрт:төртөө PRON-COLL ;
беш:бешөө PRON-COLL ;
алты:алтоо PRON-COLL ;
жети:жетөө PRON-COLL ;
LEXICON Verbs
кел%<v%>%<iv%>%<prc_impf%>%+жат%<vaux%>:келат V-INFL-COMMON ;  ! Dir/LR
бар%<v%>%<iv%>%<prc_impf%>%+жат%<vaux%>:барат V-INFL-COMMON ;  ! Dir/LR
